Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1485
Clerk of the Legislature; furnish summary of lobbyist and principal statements to Legislature and press; public records.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall prepare a summary of the statements filed pursuant to section 49-1483 and, upon request, furnish any member of the Legislature and any member of the press registered with the Legislature a copy of any summary. Each statement shall be public information. The clerk shall furnish a copy of any statement, upon request, to any member of the Legislature and to any member of the press registered with the Legislature.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 85;

Laws 1991, LB 220, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 9.